Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1917.02
Student; provisions not applicable; temporary limited computed tomography radiographer license; term; applicability of section.

(1) The requirements of section 38-1917.01 do not apply to a student while enrolled and participating in an educational program in nuclear medicine technology who, as part of the educational program, applies X-rays to humans using a computed tomography system while under the supervision of the licensed practitioners, medical radiographers, or limited computed tomography radiographers associated with the educational program. A person registered by the Nuclear Medicine Technology Certification Board or the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists in nuclear medicine technology may apply for a license as a temporary limited computed tomography radiographer. Temporary limited computed tomography radiographer licenses issued under this section shall expire twenty-four months after issuance and shall not be renewed. Persons licensed under this section as temporary limited computed tomography radiographers shall be permitted to perform medical radiography restricted to computed tomography while under the direct supervision and in the physical presence of licensed practitioners, medical radiographers, or limited computed tomography radiographers.

(2) This section shall not apply to a temporary credential issued as provided under section 38-129.01.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 61.